Utah, session 2026, SB293.
Section 1. Section 13-2-1 is amended to read:13-2-1Effective 05/06/26Superseded 07/01/26. Consumer protection division established -- Functions.(1)There is established within the Department of Commerce the Division of Consumer Protection.(2)The division shall administer and enforce the following:(a)Chapter 10a, Music Licensing Practices Act;(b)Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act;(c)Chapter 15, Business Opportunity Disclosure Act;(d)Chapter 20, New Motor Vehicle Warranties Act;(e)Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act;(f)Chapter 22, Charitable Solicitations Act;(g)Chapter 23, Health Spa Services Protection Act;(h)Chapter 25a, Telephone and Facsimile Solicitation Act;(i)Chapter 26, Telephone Fraud Prevention Act;(j)Chapter 28, Prize Notices Regulation Act;(k)Chapter 32a, Pawnshop, Secondhand Merchandise, and Catalytic Converter Transaction Information Act;(l)Chapter 34, Utah Postsecondary School and State Authorization Act;(m)Chapter 41, Price Controls During Emergencies Act;(n)Chapter 42, Uniform Debt-Management Services Act;(o)Chapter 49, Immigration Consultants Registration Act;(p)Chapter 51, Transportation Network Company Registration Act;(q)Chapter 52, Residential Solar Energy Consumer Protection Act;(r)Chapter 53, Residential, Vocational orand Life Skills Program Act;(s)Chapter 54, Ticket Website Sales Act;(t)Chapter 56, Ticket Transferability Act;(u)Chapter 57, Maintenance Funding Practices Act;(v)Chapter 61, Utah Consumer Privacy Act;(w)Chapter 64, Vehicle Value Protection Agreement Act;(x)Chapter 65, Utah Commercial Email Act;(y)Chapter 67, Online Dating Safety Act; (z)Chapter 68, Lawyer Referral Consultants Registration Act;(aa)Chapter 70, Automatic Renewal Contracts Act;(bb)Chapter 71, Utah Minor Protection in Social Media Act;(cc)Chapter 72a, Artificial Intelligence Applications Relating to Mental Health; and(dd)Chapter 78, Earned Wage Access Services Act.; and(ee)Chapter 82, Consumer Pricing Act.(3)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to establish:(a)a public list that identifies a person that:(i)violates a chapter described in Subsection (2);(ii)without proper legal justification, fails to comply with an order, subpoena, judgment, or other legal process issued by:(A)the division; or(B)a court of competentwith jurisdiction; or(iii)breaches a settlement agreement, stipulation, assurance of voluntary compliance, or similar instrument signed by the person and the division; and(b)a process by which a person may be removed from the list the division establishes as described in Subsection (3)(a).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 13-2-1 is amended to read:13-2-1Effective 07/01/26. Consumer protection division established -- Functions.(1)There is established within the Department of Commerce the Division of Consumer Protection.(2)The division shall administer and enforce the following:(a)Chapter 10a, Music Licensing Practices Act;(b)Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act;(c)Chapter 15, Business Opportunity Disclosure Act;(d)Chapter 20, New Motor Vehicle Warranties Act;(e)Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act;(f)Chapter 22, Charitable Solicitations Act;(g)Chapter 23, Health Spa Services Protection Act;(h)Chapter 25a, Telephone and Facsimile Solicitation Act;(i)Chapter 26, Telephone Fraud Prevention Act;(j)Chapter 28, Prize Notices Regulation Act;(k)Chapter 32a, Pawnshop, Secondhand Merchandise, and Catalytic Converter Transaction Information Act;(l)Chapter 34, Utah Postsecondary School and State Authorization Act;(m)Chapter 41, Price Controls During Emergencies Act;(n)Chapter 42, Uniform Debt-Management Services Act;(o)Chapter 49, Immigration Consultants Registration Act;(p)Chapter 51, Transportation Network Company Registration Act;(q)Chapter 52, Residential Solar Energy Consumer Protection Act;(r)Chapter 53, Residential, Vocational orand Life Skills Program Act;(s)Chapter 54, Ticket Website Sales Act;(t)Chapter 56, Ticket Transferability Act;(u)Chapter 57, Maintenance Funding Practices Act;(v)Chapter 61, Utah Consumer Privacy Act;(w)Chapter 64, Vehicle Value Protection Agreement Act;(x)Chapter 65, Utah Commercial Email Act;(y)Chapter 67, Online Dating Safety Act; (z)Chapter 68, Lawyer Referral Consultants Registration Act;(aa)Chapter 70, Automatic Renewal Contracts Act;(bb)Chapter 71, Utah Minor Protection in Social Media Act;(cc)Chapter 72a, Artificial Intelligence Applications Relating to Mental Health;(dd)Chapter 78, Earned Wage Access Services Act; and(ee)Chapter 81, Utah Digital Choice Act.; and(ff)Chapter 82, Consumer Pricing Act.(3)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to establish:(a)a public list that identifies a person that:(i)violates a chapter described in Subsection (2);(ii)without proper legal justification, fails to comply with an order, subpoena, judgment, or other legal process issued by:(A)the division; or(B)a court of competentwith jurisdiction; or(iii)breaches a settlement agreement, stipulation, assurance of voluntary compliance, or similar instrument signed by the person and the division; and(b)a process by which a person may be removed from the list the division establishes as described in Subsection (3)(a).

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 13-82-101 is enacted to read:82. Consumer Pricing Act1. General Provisions13-82-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Automatic pricing system" means a system, software, or process that uses an automated process to:(a)interpret and analyze one or more categories of personal data or biometric data; and(b)using the interpretation or analysis described in Subsection (1)(a):(i)assist a person in determining the price of a good or service; or(ii)set the price of a good or service without human oversight or involvement.(2)"Biometric data" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-61-101.(3)"Category of personal data" means a class, grouping, or other classification of individuals that is based on, or derived from an inference about, one or more characteristics of the personal data of more than one individual.(4)"Consumer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-61-101.(5)"Consumer transaction" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-11-3.(6)"Customer loyalty program" means a program where a supplier offers a reward or incentive to a consumer for the consumer's repeated purchases, participation, or other similar form of patronage with the supplier.(7)"Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection established in Section 13-2-1.(8)"Personal data" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-61-101.(9)"Purchase history" means information that is connected to an individual and the individual's previous purchase of a good or a service.(10)(a)"Supplier" means a seller, lessor, assignor, offeror, broker, or other person who regularly solicits, engages in, or enforces consumer transactions, whether or not the person deals directly with the consumer.(b)"Supplier" does not include a financial institution, or an affiliation of a financial institution, that is subject to the data security and privacy requirements of Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 6801 et seq.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 13-82-201 is enacted to read:2. Consumer Pricing13-82-201Effective 05/06/26. Supplier prohibited from using consumer data to increase the price of a good or service.(1)A supplier may not use any of the following to increase the price that the supplier charges an individual consumer for a good or service:(a)the consumer's personal data;(b)the consumer's biometric data;(c)the consumer's purchase history; or(d)an inference about the consumer based on an attribute described in Subsections (1)(a) through (c).(2)A supplier may use the information described in Subsection (1) to:(a)offer a price to a consumer who has an existing subscription-based agreement for a good or service with a supplier that is lower than the price for the same good or service that the supplier offers to a consumer that does not enter into a subscription-based agreement with the supplier;(b)operate a customer loyalty program;(c)offer a discount, coupon, or promotion to the consumer; or(d)use a consumer's location information, including a device's precise geolocation, to generate a price based on:(i)supply or demand conditions;(ii)located-based operational costs; or(iii)other aggregate market conditions not linked to a specific individual or device.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 13-82-202 is enacted to read:13-82-202Effective 05/06/26. Automatic pricing system.(1)If a supplier uses an automatic pricing system to increase the price of a good or a service, the supplier shall:(a)store:(i)the price the supplier charges a consumer for a good or service using the automatic pricing system; and(ii)each category of personal data that the automatic pricing system uses to increase the price of a good or service; and(b)subject to Subsection (2), retain the data described in Subsection (1)(a) for at least one year after the day on which the supplier uses the automatic pricing system to increase the price of a good or service.(2)Subsection (1) does not require a supplier to retain the characteristics of personal data used to create the categories of personal data that the automatic pricing system uses.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 13-82-301 is enacted to read:3. Enforcement13-82-301Effective 05/06/26. Enforcement powers of the division.(1)The division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter in accordance with Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection.(2)In addition to the division's enforcement powers under Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection, the division may:(a)impose an administrative fine of up to $2,500 for a violation of this chapter; and(b)bring an action in a court with jurisdiction to enforce a provision of this chapter.(3)In an action described in Subsection (2)(b), the court may:(a)declare that an act or practice violates a provision of this chapter;(b)issue an injunction for a violation of this chapter;(c)order disgorgement of any money received in violation of this chapter;(d)order payment of disgorged money to an injured purchaser or consumer;(e)impose a fine of up to $2,500 for a violation of this chapter; and(f)award any other relief that the court deems reasonable and necessary.(4)Nothing in this chapter displaces any other available remedy or right authorized under the laws of this state or the United States.

Section 7:
Section 7.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 13-2-1 Effective 07/01/26 take effect on July 1, 2026.